District of Columbia statutes.
7-761.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Department on Disability Services Establishment Act of 2006”.

History

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-264, § 101, 54 DCR 818

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 101 of Developmental Disabilities Services Management Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-672, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 1155).